New York, session 2025-2026, S5110.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 120.05 of the penal law is amended by adding four 2 new subdivisions 3-d, 3-e, 11-d and 11-e to read as follows: 3 3-d. With intent to prevent an employee of the New York city depart- 4 ment of housing preservation and development in an inspectorial, techni- 5 cal, investigative, or social service/community title, including labor 6 compliance officers engaged in development or construction projects, 7 from performing their lawful duties such person causes physical injury 8 to such employee; or 9 3-e. With intent to prevent an employee of the New York city depart- 10 ment of buildings in an inspectorial, technical, investigative, or 11 community title from performing their lawful duties such person causes 12 physical injury to such employee; or 13 11-d. With intent to cause physical injury to an employee of the New 14 York city department of housing preservation and development in an 15 inspectorial, technical, investigative, or social service/community 16 title performing their lawful duties such person causes physical injury 17 to such employee; or 18 11-e. With intent to cause physical injury to an employee of the New 19 York city department of buildings in an inspectorial, technical, inves- 20 tigative, or community title performing their lawful duties such person 21 causes physical injury to such employee; or 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04246-03-5